North Carolina statutes. Chapter 29. Intestate Succession.
Article 2. Shares of Persons Who Take upon Intestacy.

§ 29-13.
Descent and distribution upon intestacy; 120-hour survivorship requirement, revised simultaneous death act, Article 24, Chapter 28A.

All the estate of a person dying intestate shall descend and be distributed, subject to the payment of costs of administration and other lawful claims against the estate, and subject to the payment of State inheritance or estate taxes, as provided in this Chapter.

The determination of whether an heir has predeceased a person dying intestate shall be made as provided by Article 24 of Chapter 28A of the General Statutes.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1999-337, s. 5; 2007-132, s. 2.

§ 29-14.
Share of surviving spouse.

Real Property. — The share of the surviving spouse in the real property is:

If the intestate is survived by only one child or by any lineal descendant of only one deceased child, a one-half undivided interest in the real property;

If the intestate is survived by two or more children, or by one child and any lineal descendant of one or more deceased children or by lineal descendants of two or more deceased children, a one-third undivided interest in the real property;

If the intestate is not survived by a child, children or any lineal descendant of a deceased child or children, but is survived by one or more parents, a one-half undivided interest in the real property;

If the intestate is not survived by a child, children or any lineal descendant of a deceased child or children, or by a parent, all the real property.

The share of the surviving spouse in the personal property is:

If the intestate is survived by only one child or by any lineal descendant of only one deceased child, and the net personal property does not exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) in value, all of the personal property; if the net personal property exceeds sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) in value, the sum of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) plus one half of the balance of the personal property;

If the intestate is survived by two or more children, or by one child and any lineal descendant of one or more deceased children, or by lineal descendants of two or more deceased children, and the net personal property does not exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) in value, all of the personal property; if the net personal property exceeds sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) in value, the sum of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) plus one third of the balance of the personal property;

If the intestate is not survived by a child, children, or any lineal descendant of a deceased child or children, but is survived by one or more parents, and the net personal property does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in value, all of the personal property; if the net personal property exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in value, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) plus one half of the balance of the personal property;

If the intestate is not survived by a child, children, or any lineal descendant of a deceased child or children, or by a parent, all of the personal property.

When an equitable distribution of property is awarded to the surviving spouse pursuant to

G.S. 50-20

subsequent to the death of the decedent, the share of the surviving spouse determined under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be first determined as though no property had been awarded to the surviving spouse pursuant to

G.S. 50-20

subsequent to the death of the decedent, and then reduced by the net value of the marital estate awarded to the surviving spouse pursuant to G.S. 50-20 subsequent to the death of the decedent.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1979, c. 186, s. 1; 1981, c. 69; 1995, c. 262, s. 3; 2001-364, s. 6; 2012-71, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-71, s. 1, substituted “sixty thousand dollars ($60,000)” for “thirty thousand dollars ($30,000)” in subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2), and substituted “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” in subdivision (b)(3). For effective date and applicability provisions, see the Editor’s notes.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Does North Carolina Law Adequately Protect Surviving Spouses?,” see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 361 (1970).

For article, “Transferring North Carolina Real Estate Part I: How the Present System Functions,” see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 413 (1971).

For note discussing the limitation on collateral inheritance in North Carolina, see 14 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1085 (1978).

For survey of 1979 property law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1509 (1980).

For note on a surviving spouse’s right to dissent, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 251 (1980).

For article, “Class Gifts in North Carolina — When Do We ‘Call The Roll’?,” see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (1985).

For recent development, “Death and the Partnership Principle: Interpreting Recent Abatement Amendments to North Carolina’s Equitable Distribution Act,” see 80 N.C.L. Rev. 1089 (2002).

§ 29-15.
Shares of others than surviving spouse.

Those persons surviving the intestate, other than the surviving spouse, shall take that share of the net estate not distributable to the surviving spouse, or the entire net estate if there is no surviving spouse, as follows:

If the intestate is survived by only one child or by only one lineal descendant of only one deceased child, that person shall take the entire net estate or share, but if the intestate is survived by two or more lineal descendants of only one deceased child, they shall take as provided in

G.S. 29-16

; or

If the intestate is survived by two or more children or by one child and any lineal descendant of one or more deceased children, or by lineal descendants of two or more deceased children, they shall take as provided in

G.S. 29-16

; or

If the intestate is not survived by a child, children or any lineal descendant of a deceased child or children, but is survived by both parents, they shall take in equal shares, or if either parent is dead, the surviving parent shall take the entire share; or

If the intestate is not survived by such children or lineal descendants or by a parent, the brothers and sisters of the intestate, and the lineal descendants of any deceased brothers or sisters, shall take as provided in

G.S. 29-16

; or

If there is no one entitled to take under the preceding subdivisions of this section or under

G.S. 29-14

,

The paternal grandparents shall take one half of the net estate in equal shares, or, if either is dead, the survivor shall take the entire one half of the net estate, and if neither paternal grandparent survives, then the paternal uncles and aunts of the intestate and the lineal descendants of deceased paternal uncles and aunts shall take said one half as provided in

G.S. 29-16

; and

The maternal grandparents shall take the other one half in equal shares, or if either is dead, the survivor shall take the entire one half of the net estate, and if neither maternal grandparent survives, then the maternal uncles and aunts of the intestate and the lineal descendants of deceased maternal uncles and aunts shall take one half as provided in

G.S. 29-16

; but

If there is no grandparent and no uncle or aunt, or lineal descendant of a deceased uncle or aunt, on the paternal side, then those of the maternal side who otherwise would be entitled to take one half as hereinbefore provided in this subdivision shall take the whole; or

If there is no grandparent and no uncle or aunt, or lineal descendant of a deceased uncle or aunt, on the maternal side, then those on the paternal side who otherwise would be entitled to take one half as hereinbefore provided in this subdivision shall take the whole.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Does North Carolina Law Adequately Protect Surviving Spouses?,” see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 361 (1970).

For survey of 1977 law on wills, trusts and estates, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1152 (1978).

For note discussing the limitation on collateral inheritance in North Carolina, see 14 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1085 (1978).